src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Pooir
+V+Inf:pooir # ;
+V+Inf:po%{D%}eir # ;
+V+Inf:po%{D%}ier # ;
+V+Part+Pres:poänt # ;
+V:puiss PresPart ;
+V+Part+Pres:puissant PartEndings ;
+V+Part+Past:peü%{T%} # ;

+V+1s+Pres+Ind:puis # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Ind:puez # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Ind:puet # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Ind:poons # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Ind:poez # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Ind:pöez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Ind:pueent # ;

+V+1s+SPast+Ind:poi # ;
+V+2s+SPast+Ind:peüs # ;
+V+3s+SPast+Ind:peü%{T%} # ;
+V+3s+SPast+Ind:pue%{T%} # ;
+V+3s+SPast+Ind:pot # ; ! "po" is an adverb meaning "a little"
+V+1p+SPast+Ind:peümes # ;
+V+2p+SPast+Ind:peüstes # ;
+V+3p+SPast+Ind:purent # ;
+V+3p+SPast+Ind:porent # ;

! Verify
+V+1s+Ipfv+Ind:poeie # ;
+V+2s+Ipfv+Ind:poeies # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Ind:poeit # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Ind:pöeit # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Ind:poiiens # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Ind:poiiez # ;
+V+3p+Ipfv+Ind:poeient # ;

+V+1s+Fut+Ind:porrai # ;
+V+1s+Fut+Ind:pourrai # ;
+V+2s+Fut+Ind:porras # ;
+V+2s+Fut+Ind:pourras # ;
+V+3s+Fut+Ind:porra%{T%} # ;
+V+3s+Fut+Ind:pourra%{T%} # ;
+V+1p+Fut+Ind:porrons # ;
+V+1p+Fut+Ind:pourrons # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:porrez # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:pourrez # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:porreiz # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:pourreiz # ;
+V+3p+Fut+Ind:porront # ;
+V+3p+Fut+Ind:pourront # ;

+V+1s+Pres+Sbjv:puisse # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Sbjv:puisses # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Sbjv:puisse # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Sbjv:puisst # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Sbjv:puissiens # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Sbjv:puissiez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Sbjv:puissent # ;

+V+1s+Ipfv+Sbjv:peüsse # ;
+V+1s+Ipfv+Sbjv:peüsce # ;
+V+2s+Ipfv+Sbjv:peüsses # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Sbjv:peüsst # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Sbjv:peüst # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Sbjv:poïst # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Sbjv:peüssons # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Sbjv:peüssiens # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:peüssez # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:peüssiez # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:peüsseiz # ;
+V+3p+Ipfv+Sbjv:peüssent # ;

+V+1s+Pres+Cond:porreie # ;
+V+1s+Pres+Cond:pourreie # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Cond:porreis # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Cond:pourreis # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Cond:porreit # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Cond:poreit # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Cond:pourreit # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Cond:porriiens # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Cond:pourriiens # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Cond:porriiez # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Cond:pourriiez # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Cond:pourriés # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Cond:porreient # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Cond:pourreient # ;

! +V+2s+Pres+Imp:e # ; Unknown
! +V+1p+Pres+Imp:ons # ; Unknown
+V+2p+Pres+Imp:puissiez # ; ! Verify

LEXICON Doner
+V+Inf:don%>er # ;
+V:don%> PresPart ;
+V:don%> PastPart ;

+V+1s+Pres+Ind:doing # ;
+V+1s+Pres+Ind:doins # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Ind:don%>es # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Ind:don%>e # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Ind:don%>ons # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Ind:don%>ez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Ind:don%>ent # ;

+V+1s+SPast+Ind:don%>ai # ;
+V+2s+SPast+Ind:don%>as # ;
+V+3s+SPast+Ind:don%>a%{T%} # ;
+V+1p+SPast+Ind:don%>ames # ;
+V+2p+SPast+Ind:don%>astes # ;
+V+3p+SPast+Ind:don%>erent # ;

! Verify
+V+1s+Ipfv+Ind:don%>eie # ;
+V+2s+Ipfv+Ind:don%>eies # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Ind:don%>eit # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Ind:don%>iiens # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Ind:don%>iiez # ;
+V+3p+Ipfv+Ind:don%>eient # ;

+V+1s+Fut+Ind:don%>rai # ;
+V+1s+Fut+Ind:dorrai # ;
+V+1s+Fut+Ind:darai # ;
+V+2s+Fut+Ind:don%>ras # ;
+V+2s+Fut+Ind:dorras # ;
+V+2s+Fut+Ind:daras # ;
+V+3s+Fut+Ind:don%>ra%{T%} # ;
+V+3s+Fut+Ind:dorra%{T%} # ;
+V+3s+Fut+Ind:dara%{T%} # ;
+V+1p+Fut+Ind:donrons # ;
+V+1p+Fut+Ind:dorrons # ;
+V+1p+Fut+Ind:darons # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:donrez # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:dorrez # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:darez # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:donreiz # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:dorreiz # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:dareiz # ;
+V+3p+Fut+Ind:donront # ;
+V+3p+Fut+Ind:dorront # ;
+V+3p+Fut+Ind:daront # ;

+V+1s+Pres+Sbjv:doigne # ;
+V+1s+Pres+Sbjv:doinse # ;
+V+1s+Pres+Sbjv:donge # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Sbjv:doignes # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Sbjv:doinses # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Sbjv:doigne # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Sbjv:doint # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Sbjv:dont # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Sbjv:doinse # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Sbjv:doinst # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Sbjv:donge # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Sbjv:donons # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Sbjv:doigniens # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Sbjv:doinsiens # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Sbjv:donez # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Sbjv:doigniez # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Sbjv:doinsiez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Sbjv:doignent # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Sbjv:doinsent # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Sbjv:dongent # ; ! Verify

+V+1s+Ipfv+Sbjv:don%>asse # ;
+V+2s+Ipfv+Sbjv:don%>asses # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Sbjv:don%>ast # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Sbjv:don%>issons # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Sbjv:don%>issiens # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:don%>issez # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:don%>issiez # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:don%>isseiz # ;
+V+3p+Ipfv+Sbjv:don%>assent # ;

+V+1s+Pres+Cond:don%>ereie # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Cond:don%>ereis # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Cond:don%>ereit # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Cond:don%>eriiens # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Cond:don%>eriiez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Cond:don%>ereient # ;

+V+2s+Pres+Imp:don%>e # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Imp:don%>ons # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Imp:don%>ez # ;

LEXICON Metre
+V+Inf:metre # ;
+V+Inf:mettre # ;
+V+Inf:mectre # ;
+V:met PresPart ;
+V:mett PresPart ;
+V:mect PresPart ;
+V+Part+Past:mis SPartEndings ;

+V+1s+Pres+Ind:met # ;
+V+1s+Pres+Ind:mect # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Ind:mets # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Ind:mects # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Ind:met # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Ind:mect # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Ind:metons # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Ind:mectons # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Ind:metez # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Ind:mectez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Ind:metent # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Ind:mectent # ;

+V+1s+SPast+Ind:mis # ;
+V+2s+SPast+Ind:mesis # ;
+V+3s+SPast+Ind:mis%{T%} # ;
+V+1p+SPast+Ind:mesimes # ;
+V+2p+SPast+Ind:mesistes # ;
+V+3p+SPast+Ind:mistrent # ;

+V+1s+Ipfv+Ind:meteie # ;
+V+1s+Ipfv+Ind:mecteie # ;
+V+2s+Ipfv+Ind:meteies # ;
+V+2s+Ipfv+Ind:mecteies # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Ind:meteit # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Ind:mecteit # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Ind:metiiens # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Ind:mectiiens # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Ind:metiiez # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Ind:mectiiez # ;
+V+3p+Ipfv+Ind:meteient # ;
+V+3p+Ipfv+Ind:mecteient # ;

+V+1s+Fut+Ind:meterai # ;
+V+1s+Fut+Ind:metrai # ;
+V+1s+Fut+Ind:mettrai # ;
+V+2s+Fut+Ind:metras # ;
+V+2s+Fut+Ind:mettras # ;
+V+3s+Fut+Ind:metra%{T%} # ;
+V+3s+Fut+Ind:mettra%{T%} # ;
+V+1p+Fut+Ind:metrons # ;
+V+1p+Fut+Ind:mettrons # ;
+V+1p+Fut+Ind:mectrons # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:metrez # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:mettrez # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:mectrez # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:metreiz # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:mettreiz # ;
+V+3p+Fut+Ind:metront # ;
+V+3p+Fut+Ind:mettront # ;
+V+3p+Fut+Ind:mectront # ;

+V+1s+Pres+Sbjv:mete # ;
+V+1s+Pres+Sbjv:mecte # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Sbjv:metes # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Sbjv:mectes # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Sbjv:mete%{T%} # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Sbjv:mecte%{T%} # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Sbjv:metons # ; ! Verify
+V+1p+Pres+Sbjv:mectons # ; ! Verify
+V+2p+Pres+Sbjv:metez # ; ! Verify
+V+2p+Pres+Sbjv:mectez # ; ! Verify
+V+3p+Pres+Sbjv:metent # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Sbjv:mectent # ;

! Verify 1p and 2p
+V+1s+Ipfv+Sbjv:meisse # ;
+V+2s+Ipfv+Sbjv:meisses # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Sbjv:meisst # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Sbjv:meissons # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Sbjv:meissiens # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:meissez # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:meissiez # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:meisseiz # ;
+V+3p+Ipfv+Sbjv:meissent # ;
+V+3p+Ipfv+Sbjv:mesissent # ;

+V+1s+Pres+Cond:metereie # ;
+V+1s+Pres+Cond:metreie # ;
+V+1s+Pres+Cond:mettreie # ;
+V+1s+Pres+Cond:mectreie # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Cond:metereis # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Cond:metreis # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Cond:mettreis # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Cond:mectreis # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Cond:metereit # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Cond:metreit # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Cond:mettreit # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Cond:mectreit # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Cond:meteriiens # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Cond:metriiens # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Cond:mettriiens # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Cond:mectriiens # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Cond:meteriiez # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Cond:metriiez # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Cond:mettriiez # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Cond:mectriiez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Cond:metereient # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Cond:metreient # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Cond:mettreient # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Cond:mectreient # ;

+V+2s+Pres+Imp:met # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Imp:mect # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Imp:metons # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Imp:mettons # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Imp:mectons # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Imp:metez # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Imp:mettez # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Imp:mectez # ;
